Hawaii statutes.
§437B-3 Motor vehicle repair industry
board. There shall be a motor vehicle repair industry board consisting of
seven members. Three members of the board shall be persons connected with the
motor vehicle repair industry and at least two of those members shall be motor
vehicle mechanics licensed under this chapter. The remaining four members
shall not be connected with the motor vehicle repair industry. [L 1975, c 143,
pt of §2; am L 1982, c 204, §8; gen ch 1985; am L 1992, c 202, §31; am L 1998,
c 199, §9]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next